District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0371.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Closing of a Portion of a Public Alley and Establishment of a Building
Restriction Line in Square 2319, S.O. 22-02364, Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. (a) Pursuant to section 404 of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 787; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.04), and consistent with the Street
and Alley Closing Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law
4-201; D.C. Official Code § 9-201.01 et seq.), the Council finds that the portion of the public
alley system in Square 2319, as shown on the Surveyor’s plat filed under S.O. 22-02364, is
unnecessary for alley purposes and orders it closed with title to the land to vest as shown on the
Surveyor’s plat, for a payment to the District in the amount of $2000.
(b) The existing building restriction line in Lot 77 of Square 2319 shall be extended over
the portion of the alley closed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, as shown on the
Surveyor’s plat in the official file for S.O. 22-02364.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2